Utah statutes.
76-8-1202.   Application of part.

(1)  This part does not apply to offenses by providers under the state's Medicaid program that are actionable under Title 26, Chapter 20, False Claims Act.

(2) (a)  Section 35A-1-503 applies to criminal actions taken under this part.

(b)  The repayment of funds or other benefits obtained in violation of the provisions of this chapter shall not constitute a defense or grounds for dismissal of a criminal action.

